Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201371-1567
Seal; denied
or suspended; hearing; appeal.

(1) The commission
shall refuse to issue a seal to a manufacturer for any modular housing unit
not found to be in compliance with its standards governing the construction
of or the structural, plumbing, heating, or electrical systems for modular
housing units or for which fees have not been paid. Except in case of failure
to pay the required fees, any such manufacturer may request a hearing before
the commission on the issue of such refusal. Procedures for notice and opportunity
for a hearing before the commission shall be pursuant to the Administrative
Procedure Act. The refusal may be appealed, and the appeal shall be in accordance
with section 75-136.

(2) The issuance of seals may be suspended as to any manufacturer
who is convicted of violating section 71-1563 or as to any manufacturer who
violates any other provision of the Nebraska Uniform Standards for Modular
Housing Units Act or any rule, regulation, commission order, or standard adopted
pursuant thereto, and issuance of the seals shall not be resumed until such
manufacturer submits sufficient proof that the conditions which caused the
violation have been remedied. Any such manufacturer may request a hearing
before the commission on the issue of such suspension. Procedures for notice
and opportunity for a hearing before the commission shall be pursuant to the
Administrative Procedure Act. The suspension may be appealed, and the appeal
shall be in accordance with section
75-136.

Laws 1976, LB 248, § 13;

Laws 1984, LB 822, § 13;

Laws 1988, LB 352, § 121;

Laws 1998, LB 1073, § 101;

Laws 2008, LB797, § 11;

Laws 2013, LB545, § 2.
September 6, 2013
Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.